app/polish.aff
flag *v:

        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CY
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CYCH
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CYM
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CYMI
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CE
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CEGO
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CEJ
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CEMU
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡CA
        C I E C                 >       -C,KN¡C¡


        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CY
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYCH
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYM
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYMI
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CE
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEGO
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEMU
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEJ
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CA
        M I E ¦ Æ               >       -E¦Æ,OT¡C¡


        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CY
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CYCH
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CYM
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CYMI
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CE
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CEGO
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CEMU
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CEJ
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡CA
        M Ó C                   >       -ÓC,OG¡C¡

        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CY
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CYCH
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CYM
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CYMI
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CE
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CEGO
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CEMU
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CEJ
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡CA
        [PR] A ¦ Æ              >       -¦Æ,DN¡C¡

        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CY
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CYCH
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CYM
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CYMI
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CE
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CEGO
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CEMU
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CEJ
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡CA
        [PS] I E C              >       -C,K¡C¡

        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CY
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CYCH
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CYM
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CYMI
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CE
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CEGO
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CEMU
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CEJ
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡CA
        L E C                   >       -C,K¡C¡

        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CY
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYCH
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYM
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYMI
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CE
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEGO
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEMU
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEJ
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CA
        L E ¦ Æ                 >       -E¦Æ,OT¡C¡

        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CY
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CYCH
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CYM
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CYMI
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CE
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CEGO
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CEJ
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CEMU
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡CA
        J E ¦ Æ                 >       -¦Æ,DZ¡C¡

        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CY
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYCH
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYM
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CYMI
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CE
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEGO
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEMU
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CEJ
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡CA
        G N I E ¦ Æ             >       -E¦Æ,OT¡C¡

        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CY
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CEGO
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CEMU
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CYCH
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CYM
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CYMI
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CA
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CE
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡C¡
        [^BMRTW] Y Æ            >       -YÆ,¡CEJ

        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CY
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CEGO
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CEMU
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CYCH
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CYM
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CYMI
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CA
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CE
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡C¡
        [MRTW] Y Æ              >       -Æ,J¡CEJ

        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CY
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CYCH
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CYM
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CYMI
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CE
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CEGO
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CEMU
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CEJ
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡CA
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,¡C¡

        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CY
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CYCH
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CYM
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CYMI
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CE
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CEGO
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CEMU
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CEJ
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡CA
        [AEO] I Æ               >       -IÆ,J¡C¡

        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CY
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CYCH
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CYM
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CYMI
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CE
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CEGO
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CEMU
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CEJ
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡CA
        [^¬] [^AÊOR] Z I Æ      >       -IÆ,¡C¡

        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CY
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CYCH
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CYM
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CYMI
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CE
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CEGO
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CEMU
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CEJ
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡CA
        ¬ D Z I Æ               >       -¬DZIÆ,¯D¯¡C¡

        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CY
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CYCH
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CYM
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CYMI
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CE
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CEGO
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CEMU
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CEJ
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡CA
        [AÊOR] Z I Æ            >       -ZIÆ,¯¡C¡

        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CY
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CYCH
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CYM
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CYMI
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CE
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CEGO
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CEMU
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CEJ
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡CA
        L I Æ                   >       -IÆ,¡C¡

        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CY
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CYCH
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CYM
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CYMI
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CE
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CEGO
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CEMU
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CEJ
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡CA
        [^¦Z] C I Æ             >       -IÆ,¡C¡

        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CY
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CYCH
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CYM
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CYMI
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CE
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CEGO
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CEMU
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CEJ
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡CA
        Z C I Æ                 >       -IÆ,Z¡C¡

        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CY
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CYCH
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CYM
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CYMI
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CE
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CEGO
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CEMU
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CEJ
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡CA
        S I Æ                   >       -IÆ,Z¡C¡

        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CY
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CYCH
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CYM
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CYMI
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CE
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CEGO
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CEMU
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CEJ
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡CA
        ¦ C I Æ                 >       -¦CIÆ,SZCZ¡C¡

        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CY
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CYCH
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CYM
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CYMI
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CE
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CEGO
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CEMU
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CEJ
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡CA
        [BCDFGHIJLKMNSTWZ¯] A Æ >       -Æ,J¡C¡

        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CY
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CYCH
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CYM
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CYMI
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CE
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CEGO
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CEMU
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CEJ
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡CA
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,CZ¡C¡

        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CY
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CYCH
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CYM
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CYMI
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CE
        £ T A Æ                 >       -TAÆ,C¡CEGO
